ne_affix.dat
SFX m Y 38
SFX m 0 पनि .
SFX m 0 अगाडि .
SFX m 0 पछाडि .
SFX m 0 सम्बन्धी .
SFX m 0 मुन्तिर .
SFX m 0 को .
SFX m 0 का .
SFX m 0 मा .
SFX m 0 बाट .
SFX m 0 पछि .
SFX m 0 माथि .
SFX m 0 मै .
SFX m 0 अघि .
SFX m 0 जस्तो .
SFX m 0 जस्ता .
SFX m 0 जस्तै .
SFX m 0 देखि .
SFX m 0 मात्र .
SFX m 0 सम्म .
SFX m 0 सम्मको .
SFX m 0 सम्मका .
SFX m 0 भित्र .
SFX m 0 भित्रको .
SFX m 0 भित्रै .
SFX m 0 प्रति .
SFX m 0 भन्दा .
SFX m 0 बारे .
SFX m 0 समेत .
SFX m 0 कै .
SFX m 0 लगायत .
SFX m 0 लगायतका .
SFX m 0 तिर .
SFX m 0 बाहेक .
SFX m 0 लाई .
SFX m 0 तर्फ .
SFX m 0 मध्ये .
SFX m 0 भर .
SFX m 0 भरि .

SFX N Y 50
SFX N 0 कहाँ .
SFX N 0 पनि .
SFX N 0 चाहीँँ .
SFX N 0 बीच .
SFX N 0 अगाडि .
SFX N 0 पछाडि .
SFX N 0 सम्बन्धी .
SFX N 0 को .
SFX N 0 का .
SFX N 0 मा .
SFX N 0 ले .
SFX N 0 लाई .
SFX N 0 बाट .
SFX N 0 सँग .
SFX N 0 सँगको .
SFX N 0 सँगका .
SFX N 0 सँगै .
SFX N 0 द्वारा .
SFX N 0 सित .
SFX N 0 पछि .
SFX N 0 मार्फत .
SFX N 0 माथि .
SFX N 0 माथिबाट .
SFX N 0 मै .
SFX N 0 अघि .
SFX N 0 पछिका .
SFX N 0 पछिकी .
SFX N 0 जस्तो .
SFX N 0 जस्ता .
SFX N 0 जस्तै .
SFX N 0 देखि .
SFX N 0 मात्र .
SFX N 0 सम्म .
SFX N 0 सम्ममा .
SFX N 0 सम्मका .
SFX N 0 भित्र .
SFX N 0 प्रति .
SFX N 0 प्रतिको .
SFX N 0 प्रतिका .
SFX N 0 भन्दा .
SFX N 0 भन्दापर .
SFX N 0 बारे .
SFX N 0 समेत .
SFX N 0 कै .
SFX N 0 लगायत .
SFX N 0 लगायतका .
SFX N 0 तिर .
SFX N 0 बाहेक .
SFX N 0 अनुसार .
SFX N 0 मध्ये .

SFX n Y 27
SFX n 0 को .
SFX n 0 का .
SFX n 0 मा .
SFX n 0 पछि .
SFX n 0 मै .
SFX n 0 अघि .
SFX n 0 अघिदेखि .
SFX n 0 पछिका .
SFX n 0 पछिकी .
SFX n 0 जस्तो .
SFX n 0 जस्ता .
SFX n 0 जस्तै .
SFX n 0 देखि .
SFX n 0 मात्र .
SFX n 0 सम्म .
SFX n 0 सम्ममा .
SFX n 0 सम्मका .
SFX n 0 भित्र .
SFX n 0 भित्रमा .
SFX n 0 भन्दा .
SFX n 0 भन्दापर .
SFX n 0 बारे .
SFX n 0 समेत .
SFX n 0 कै .
SFX n 0 लगायत .
SFX n 0 तिर .
SFX n 0 बाहेक .

SFX O Y 48
SFX O 0 पनि .
SFX O 0 अगाडि .
SFX O 0 पछाडि .
SFX O 0 सम्बन्धी .
SFX O 0 बारे .
SFX O 0 को .
SFX O 0 का .
SFX O 0 मा .
SFX O 0 ले .
SFX O 0 बाट .
SFX O 0 सँग .
SFX O 0 सँगको .
SFX O 0 सँगका .
SFX O 0 सँगै .
SFX O 0 द्वारा .
SFX O 0 सित .
SFX O 0 पछि .
SFX O 0 मार्फत .
SFX O 0 माथि .
SFX O 0 माथिबाट .
SFX O 0 मै .
SFX O 0 अघि .
SFX O 0 अघिदेखि .
SFX O 0 पछिका .
SFX O 0 जस्तो .
SFX O 0 जस्ता .
SFX O 0 जस्तै .
SFX O 0 देखि .
SFX O 0 मात्र .
SFX O 0 सम्म .
SFX O 0 सम्ममा .
SFX O 0 सम्मका .
SFX O 0 भित्र .
SFX O 0 भित्रै .
SFX O 0 प्रति .
SFX O 0 भन्दा .
SFX O 0 भन्दापर .
SFX O 0 समेत .
SFX O 0 कै .
SFX O 0 लगायत .
SFX O 0 तिर .
SFX O 0 बाहेक .
SFX O 0 अनुसार .
SFX O 0 लाई .
SFX O 0 मध्ये .
SFX O 0 सहित .
SFX O 0 सहितको .
SFX O 0 सहितका .

SFX o Y 44
SFX o 0 पनि .
SFX o 0 को .
SFX o 0 का .
SFX o 0 मा .
SFX o 0 ले .
SFX o 0 बाट .
SFX o 0 अगाडि .
SFX o 0 पछाडि .
SFX o 0 सँग .
SFX o 0 सँगको .
SFX o 0 सँगका .
SFX o 0 सँगै .
SFX o 0 द्वारा .
SFX o 0 सित .
SFX o 0 पछि .
SFX o 0 मार्फत .
SFX o 0 माथि .
SFX o 0 माथिबाट .
SFX o 0 मै .
SFX o 0 अघि .
SFX o 0 अघिदेखि .
SFX o 0 पछिका .
SFX o 0 जस्तो .
SFX o 0 जस्ता .
SFX o 0 जस्तै .
SFX o 0 देखि .
SFX o 0 मात्र .
SFX o 0 सम्म .
SFX o 0 सम्ममा .
SFX o 0 सम्मका .
SFX o 0 भित्र .
SFX o 0 भित्रै .
SFX o 0 प्रति .
SFX o 0 भन्दा .
SFX o 0 भन्दापर .
SFX o 0 बारे .
SFX o 0 समेत .
SFX o 0 कै .
SFX o 0 लगायत .
SFX o 0 लगायतका .
SFX o 0 तिर .
SFX o 0 बाहेक .
SFX o 0 लाई .
SFX o 0 मध्ये .

SFX P Y 1
SFX P 0 /Hk .

SFX p Y 1
SFX p 0 /Hi .

SFX Q Y 1
SFX Q 0 /Hk .

SFX q Y 1
SFX q 0 ीय .

SFX R Y 1
SFX R 0 वाची .

SFX r Y 3
SFX r 0 ात्मक .
SFX r ा ात्मक ा
SFX r ि ्यात्मक ि

SFX S Y 1
SFX S 0 ीकृत .

SFX s Y 1
SFX s 0 ीयता .

SFX T Y 4
SFX T 0 िक .
SFX T ा िक ा
SFX T ि िक ि
SFX T ी िक ी

SFX t Y 2
SFX t 0 /Hkq .
SFX t ा /Hkq ा

SFX U Y 128
SFX U 0 नेमात्र ्
SFX U 0 दारहेछौ ्
SFX U 0 नेथियो ्
SFX U 0 नुपरिरहेको ्
SFX U 0 नेगर्दछ ्
SFX U 0 नुहुन्न ्
SFX U 0 नेछन् ्
SFX U 0 नुपर्ला ्
SFX U 0 नुपर्दछ ्
SFX U 0 नुछ ्
SFX U 0 नलाग्यो ्
SFX U 0 नुभएनछ ्
SFX U 0 नुभयो ्
SFX U 0 नुभएर ्
SFX U 0 नुभएको ्
SFX U 0 नुभएन ्
SFX U 0 नुभएका ्
SFX U 0 नुभएछ ्
SFX U 0 नुपर्दा ्
SFX U 0 नुपर्दो ्
SFX U 0 नुपर्नेछ ्
SFX U 0 नुपर्थ्यो ्
SFX U 0 नुपर्दैन ्
SFX U 0 नुपर्दैनथ्यो ्
SFX U 0 नुपरेर ्
SFX U 0 नुपरे ्
SFX U 0 नुपरेको ्
SFX U 0 नुपरेन ्
SFX U 0 नुपरेका ्
SFX U 0 नुपर्नेबारे ्
SFX U 0 नुपर्यो ्
SFX U 0 नुपर्ने ्
SFX U 0 नुपर्छ ्
SFX U 0 नुपरेछ ्
SFX U 0 नुहुने ्
SFX U 0 नुहुन ्
SFX U 0 नुहुँदै ्
SFX U 0 नुहुँदा ्
SFX U 0 नुहुन्थ्यो ्
SFX U 0 नुहुँदैछ ्
SFX U 0 नुहुँदैनथ्यो ्
SFX U 0 नुहोस् ्
SFX U 0 नुहोला ्
SFX U 0 नुहुनेबारे ्
SFX U 0 नुहुन्छ ्
SFX U 0 नुहुनेछ ्
SFX U 0 नुहुँदैन ्
SFX U 0 दोरहेछु ्
SFX U 0 दोरहेछौ ्
SFX U 0 दारहेछौँ ्
SFX U 0 दोरहेछस् ्
SFX U 0 दोरहेछ ्
SFX U 0 नसक्यो ्
SFX U 0 नसके ्
SFX U 0 नसक्छ ्
SFX U 0 नसकेछ ्
SFX U 0 नसक्नेछ ्
SFX U 0 नसक्नेछन् ्
SFX U 0 नसक्नु ्
SFX U 0 नसक्ने ्
SFX U 0 नसक्दी ्
SFX U 0 नसक्दो ्
SFX U 0 नसक्छु ्
SFX U 0 नसक्छौ ्
SFX U 0 नसक्छस् ्
SFX U 0 नसक्छौँ ्
SFX U 0 नसक्छेस् ्
SFX U 0 नसक्छन् ्
SFX U 0 नसक्छिन् ्
SFX U 0 नसक्नेछौँ ्
SFX U 0 नसक्नेछौ ्
SFX U 0 नसक्छ्यौ ्
SFX U 0 नसक्छे ्
SFX U 0 नसक्नेछस् ्
SFX U 0 नसक्थिस् ्
SFX U 0 नसक्थ्यौ ्
SFX U 0 नसक्थ्यौँ ्
SFX U 0 नसक्थे ्
SFX U 0 नसक्थ्यो ्
SFX U 0 नसक्थी ्
SFX U 0 नसक्थिन् ्
SFX U 0 नसक्दैन ्
SFX U 0 नसक्दैनौ ्
SFX U 0 नसक्दैनौँ ्
SFX U 0 नसक्दिनौ ्
SFX U 0 नसक्दैनन् ्
SFX U 0 नसक्नेछु ्
SFX U 0 नसक्दैनथ्यो ्
SFX U 0 नसक्दैनथे ्
SFX U 0 नसक्यौँ ्
SFX U 0 नसक्यौ ्
SFX U 0 नसकेनन् ्
SFX U 0 नसकेर ्
SFX U 0 नसकेन ्
SFX U 0 नसकेनौ ्
SFX U 0 नसकेनौँ ्
SFX U 0 नसकेस् ्
SFX U 0 नसकोस् ्
SFX U 0 नसकेछन् ्
SFX U 0 नसकेछौ ्
SFX U 0 नसकुन्जेल ्
SFX U 0 नसकिन् ्
SFX U 0 नसकिन ्
SFX U 0 नसकिनस् ्
SFX U 0 नसकिँन ्
SFX U 0 नसकिनौ ्
SFX U 0 नसकिनन् ्
SFX U 0 नसकिस् ्
SFX U 0 नसकी ्
SFX U 0 नसकिनेछ ्
SFX U 0 नसकिएला ्
SFX U 0 नसकुन् ्
SFX U 0 नसकिछस् ्
SFX U 0 नसकिछन् ्
SFX U 0 नसकिछ ्
SFX U 0 नसकूँ ्
SFX U 0 नसकेको ्
SFX U 0 नसकेका ्
SFX U 0 नसक्ला ्
SFX U 0 नसक्नेबारे ्
SFX U ् िएछ ्
SFX U 0 नसक्नुहुन्छ ्
SFX U 0 नसक्नुभयो ्
SFX U 0 नसक्नुहुन्थ्यो ्
SFX U 0 नसकिएछ ्
SFX U 0 नसक्दछ ्
SFX U ् /u ्
SFX U ् /V ्

SFX u Y 53
SFX u 0 नेमात्र [उ]
SFX u 0 ँदैछन् [उ]
SFX u 0 नेथियो [उ]
SFX u 0 नेछिन् [उ]
SFX u 0 नलाग्यो [उ]
SFX u 0 नुभएनछ [उ]
SFX u 0 ँछन् [उ]
SFX u 0 ँछ [उ]
SFX u 0 नेछौँ [उ]
SFX u 0 नुहुन्न [उ]
SFX u 0 नुपर्दछ [उ]
SFX u 0 नुहुन्नथ्यो [उ]
SFX u 0 नुभयो [उ]
SFX u 0 नुभएर [उ]
SFX u 0 नुभएको [उ]
SFX u 0 नुभएन [उ]
SFX u 0 नुभएका [उ]
SFX u 0 नुभए [उ]
SFX u 0 नुभएछ [उ]
SFX u 0 नुपर्दा [उ]
SFX u 0 नुपर्दो [उ]
SFX u 0 नुपर्नेछ [उ]
SFX u 0 नुपर्थ्यो [उ]
SFX u 0 नुपर्दैन [उ]
SFX u 0 नुपर्दैनथ्यो [उ]
SFX u 0 नुपरेर [उ]
SFX u 0 नुपरेको [उ]
SFX u 0 नुपरेन [उ]
SFX u 0 नुपर्न [उ]
SFX u 0 नुपर्यो [उ]
SFX u 0 नुपर्ने [उ]
SFX u 0 नुपर्छ [उ]
SFX u 0 नुपरेछ [उ]
SFX u 0 नुहुने [उ]
SFX u 0 नुहुन [उ]
SFX u 0 नुहुँदै [उ]
SFX u 0 नुहुँदा [उ]
SFX u 0 नुहुन्थ्यो [उ]
SFX u 0 नुहुँदैछ [उ]
SFX u 0 नुहुँदैनथ्यो [उ]
SFX u 0 नुहोस् [उ]
SFX u 0 नुहोला [उ]
SFX u 0 नुहुनेबारे [उ]
SFX u 0 नुहुन्छ [उ]
SFX u 0 नुहुनेछ [उ]
SFX u 0 नुहुँदो [उ]
SFX u 0 नुहुँदैन [उ]
SFX u 0 ँदोरहेछु [उ]
SFX u 0 ँदारहेछौ [उ]
SFX u 0 ँदोरहेछस् [उ]
SFX u 0 ँदोरहेछ [उ]
SFX u 0 ँदारहेछन् [उ]
SFX u 0 ँदिरहिछिन् [उ]
